South Dakota, session 2026, SB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 40-36-9 be AMENDED:
40-36-9. TheExcept as otherwise provided for in this section, the Department of
Game, Fish and Parks may direct or employ personnel and conduct programs, and the
Game, Fish and Parks Commission may adopt, pursuant to chapter 1-26 necessary, rules
to control foxes, coyotes, feral dogs, prairie dogs, and other wild animals. The expense
thereof shall must be paid out of the Department of Game, Fish and Parks department of
game, fish and parks fund or the state animal damage control fund.
Nothing in this section authorizes the expenditure of moneys as a bounty for the
taking of any badger, opossum, racoon, striped skunk, red fox, or other animal, if the
purpose for the taking is the control of nest predation.
Section 2. That § 41-2-35 be AMENDED:
41-2-35. AllExcept as otherwise provided for in this section, all moneys in the
Department of Game, Fish and Parks department of game, fish, and parks fund are hereby
annually appropriated, to be used with any moneys otherwise appropriated, to pay the
necessary expenses of effectuating the purposes of this title.
Nothing in this section authorizes the expenditure of moneys as a bounty for the
taking of any badger, opossum, racoon, striped skunk, red fox, or other animal, if the
purpose for the taking is the control of nest predation.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.